Wyoming, session 2025, HB0070.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 41-7-412 and 41-7-813 are amended to
read:

41-7-412. Advertisement for bids.

In all cases where the work to be done at any one (1) time
under the direction of the commissioners will, in their
opinion, cost to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars
HB0070

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0204
($7,500.00) seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00), the
same shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, and the
commissioner shall advertise for sealed bids, by notice
published in some newspaper published in the county in
which the petition is filed, and may advertise in one (1)
or more newspapers published elsewhere. If there be no
newspaper published in the county in which the petition is
filed, they shall advertise in some newspaper published in
an adjoining county, which said notice shall particularly
set forth the time and place when and where the bids
advertised will be opened, the kind of work to be let and
the terms of payment. Said commissioners may continue the
letting from time to time, if in their judgment the same
shall be necessary, and shall reserve the right to reject
any and all bids. This section shall not be construed to
apply to the employment of superintendent, engineer,
attorney or other employee engaged in the general work of
the district.

41-7-813. Construction of irrigation works; cost
estimates; advertisement for bids; contracts.

HB0070

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0204
Before any district shall enter into any contract for the
construction, building, alteration, extension, or
improvement of any irrigation works, power plant or system,
or any part or section thereof for the use of the district,
or for the purchase of any materials, machinery, or
apparatus, such district shall cause estimates of the cost
thereof to be made by some competent engineer or engineers
and if such estimated cost shall exceed the sum of one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) no such contract shall be entered into for a
price, cost or consideration exceeding such estimate nor
without advertising for sealed bids. Prior to such
advertisement, plans and specifications for the proposed
construction work or materials shall be prepared and filed
at the principal office or place of business of the
district. Such advertisement shall be inserted for three
(3) consecutive issues, with not less than twenty (20) days
intervening between the first and last publication dates,
in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation in the
district and, in the discretion of the board of directors
of the district, in such additional newspapers or trade or
technical periodicals as may be selected by the board in
order to give proper notice of the receiving of bids. Such
HB0070

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0204
advertisement shall designate the nature of the
construction work proposed to be done or materials proposed
to be purchased; that the plans and specifications therefor
may be inspected at the office of the district, giving the
location thereof, and shall designate the time within which
bids shall be filed and the date, hour and place the same
shall be opened. The board of directors of the district,
with the assistance of the state engineer, whose duty it
shall be to supervise such lettings, may let the contract
for such work or materials to the lowest responsible
bidder, or, in the sole discretion of the board, all bids
tendered may be rejected and readvertisement for bids made
in the manner, form and time in this section provided. No
such contract shall be valid nor shall any money of the
district be expended thereunder unless advertisement and
letting shall have been had as in this section provided.
Such contract shall provide that wherever possible workmen
who are citizens of Wyoming shall be employed by the
contractor. All provisions of W.S. 16-6-112 through
16-6-115, with reference to contractor's bonds, shall be
applicable and effective as to any contract let pursuant to
the provisions of this act; provided further, that if all
or a portion of the cost of the proposed works is to be met
HB0070

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0204
by grant of labor or a grant in aid from a federal or state
agency, the rules and regulations of which agency provide
that work shall not be done by contract, the board may
proceed with the necessary construction or other work
without first complying with any of the foregoing
provisions of this section.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0070